District of Columbia statutes.
2-1533.01

Establishment of the Commission on Juvenile Justice Reform.

(a)

There is established a Juvenile Justice Commission (“Commission”).

(b)

The Commission shall be empaneled within 30 days of September 24, 2010.

(c)

(1)

The Commission shall be comprised of 12 members, who shall serve without public compensation and who shall be appointed as follows:

(A)

Four members to be appointed by the Chairman of the Council of the District of Columbia, in consultation with the Chairs of the related committees of the Council, one of whom shall be a representative of the public;

(B)

Four members to be appointed by the Mayor, one of whom shall be a representative of the public; and

(C)

Four members to be appointed by the Chief Judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, one of whom shall be a representative of the public.

(2)

The Chair of the Commission shall be selected by the members of the Commission.

(d)

(1)

To be eligible for appointment as a Commissioner, other than as a member of the public, a person shall have individual expertise in a relevant discipline and familiarity with the laws, standards, and services related to youth safety and juvenile justice reform.

(2)

To be eligible for appointment as a Commissioner as a representative of the public, a person shall not be required to have special expertise of any kind.

(e)

The Office of the City Administrator shall provide administrative and staff support for the Commission and seek private financial support.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5142, 57 DCR 6242

Short title: Section 5141 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle O of title V of the act may be cited as the “Commission on Juvenile Justice Reform Establishment Act of 2010”.

Section 3041 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle E of Title III of the act may be cited as the “Alternatives to Juvenile Arrest and Secured Detention Working Group Establishment Act of 2013”.

Sections 3042 to 3045 of D.C. Law 20-61 established an Alternatives to Juvenile Arrest and Secured Detention Working Group (“Working Group”), responsible for developing a differential response policy, program, and budget for juvenile arrests with the goal of diverting more youth from arrest, prosecution, overnight detention, or pre-trial detention.
For temporary establishment of the Alternatives to Juvenile Arrest and Secured Detention Working Group, see §§ 3041-3045 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 11384), applicable as of October 1, 2013.
For temporary establishment of the Alternatives to Juvenile Arrest and Secured Detention Working Group, see §§ 3041-3044 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384), applicable as of October 1, 2013.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5142 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).